Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-497.04
Noncompliance; penalty.

Failure, refusal, or neglect by any officer to comply with any of the provisions of sections 60-497.01 to 60-497.03 shall constitute misconduct in office and shall be grounds for his or her removal therefrom.

Laws 1931, c. 110, § 58, p. 326;

Laws 1941, c. 124, § 9, p. 477;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-1189;

R.S.1943, § 39-797;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-669.25;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 78.